Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201858-861
Nebraska Health Education Assistance Loan Program; bonds; security.

Notwithstanding section 58-843, the principal of and
interest on any bonds issued by the authority for the Nebraska Health Education
Assistance Loan Program shall be secured by a pledge of the revenue and other
money out of which such principal and interest shall be made payable and may
be secured by a trust indenture, mortgage, or deed of trust, including an
assignment of a loan or contract right of the authority pursuant to a loan,
covering all or any part of a loan from which the revenue or receipts so pledged
may be derived.

Laws 1983, LB 159, § 11;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2958;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 58;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1758;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 61.